Nebraska, session 109, LB1223.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB1223 LB1223
2026 2026
Section 1. Section 60-6,221, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska,
is amended to read:
60-6,221 (1) The headlights of motor vehicles shall be so
constructed, arranged, and adjusted that, except as provided in
subsection (2) of this section, they will at all times mentioned in
section 60-6,219 produce a driving light sufficient to render clearly
discernible a person two hundred feet ahead, but the headlights shall not
project a glaring or dazzling light to persons in front of such
headlights.
(2) Headlights shall be deemed to comply with the provisions
prohibiting glaring and dazzling lights if:
(a) None none of the main bright portion of the headlight beam rises
above a horizontal plane passing through the light centers parallel to
the level road upon which the loaded vehicle stands and in no case higher
than forty-two inches, seventy-five feet ahead of the vehicle; .
(b) The intensity of light emitted by the headlight does not exceed
three thousand lumens according to the physical and photometry test
procedures provided in 49 C.F.R. 571.108, as such regulation existed on
January 1, 2026;
(c) The color temperature of light emitted by the headlight does not
exceed six thousand kelvin and the color of such light is white, yellow,
or amber. This subdivision (c) shall not apply to authorized emergency
vehicles;
(d) The headlight is mounted on the motor vehicle at a height of
fifty-four inches or less above the ground;
(e) The headlight, or the fixture for the headlight, has not been
substantially altered from the design or performance of the headlight or
fixture that was originally installed by the manufacturer of the motor
vehicle; and
(f) The headlight is compliant with the United States Department of
Transportation's Federal Motor Vehicle Safety Standards, 49 C.F.R. part
-2-

LB1223 LB1223
2026 2026
571, for lamps, reflective devices, and associated equipment, as such
standards existed on January 1, 2026.
Sec. 2. Section 60-6,224, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
60-6,224 Notwithstanding any other provision of the Nebraska Rules
of the Road:
(1) Whenever any person operating a motor vehicle on any highway in
this state comes within one thousand feet of meets another person
operating a motor vehicle, proceeding in the opposite direction and
equipped with headlights constructed and adjusted to project glaring or
dazzling light to persons in front of such headlights, he or she upon
signal of either person, the other shall dim the headlights of his or her
motor vehicle or tilt the beams of glaring or dazzling light projecting
therefrom downward so as not to blind or confuse the vision of the
operator in front of such headlights; and
(2) Whenever any person operating a motor vehicle on any highway in
this state follows another vehicle within four two hundred feet to the
rear or is preparing to overtake another motor vehicle by passing, he or
she shall dim the headlights of his or her motor vehicle or tilt the
beams of glaring or dazzling light projecting from such headlights
therefrom downward.
(3) Any person who violates any provision of this section shall be
guilty of a Class V misdemeanor.
Sec. 3. Section 60-1411.03, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
60-1411.03 It shall be unlawful for any licensee or motor vehicle
dealer to engage, directly or indirectly, in the following acts:
(1) To advertise and offer any year, make, engine size, model, type,
equipment, price, trade-in allowance, or terms or make other claims or
conditions pertaining to the sale, leasing, or rental of motor vehicles,
motorcycles, and trailers which are not truthful and clearly set forth;
-3-

LB1223 LB1223
2026 2026
(2) To advertise for sale, lease, or rental a specific motor
vehicle, motorcycle, or trailer which is not in the possession of the
dealer, owner, or advertiser and willingly shown and sold, as advertised,
illustrated, or described, at the advertised price and terms, at the
advertised address. Unless otherwise specified, a motor vehicle,
motorcycle, or trailer advertised for sale shall be in operable condition
and, on request, the advertiser thereof shall show records to
substantiate an advertised offer;
(3) To advertise a new motor vehicle, motorcycle, or trailer at a
price which does not include standard equipment with which it is fitted
or is ordinarily fitted, without disclosing such fact, or eliminating any
such equipment for the purpose of advertising a low price;
(4) To advertise (a) that the advertiser's prices are always or
generally lower than competitive prices and not met or equalled by others
or that the advertiser always or generally undersells competitors, (b)
that the advertiser's prices are always or generally the lowest or that
no other dealer has lower prices, (c) that the advertiser is never
undersold, or (d) that no other advertiser or dealer will have a lower
price;
(5) To advertise and make statements such as, Write Your Own Deal,
Name Your Own Price, or Name Your Own Monthly Payments and other
statements of a similar nature;
(6) To advertise by making disparaging comparisons with competitors'
services, quality, price, products, or business methods;
(7) To advertise by making the layout, headlines, illustrations, and
type size of an advertisement so as to convey or permit an erroneous
impression as to which motor vehicle, motorcycle, or trailer or motor
vehicles, motorcycles, or trailers are offered at featured prices. No
advertised offer, expression, or display of price, terms, downpayment,
trade-in allowance, cash difference, or savings shall be misleading by
itself, and any qualification to such offer, expression, or display shall
-4-

LB1223 LB1223
2026 2026
be clearly and conspicuously set forth in comparative type size and
style, location, and layout to prevent deception;
(8) To advertise the price of a motor vehicle, motorcycle, or
trailer without including all charges which the customer must pay for the
motor vehicle, motorcycle, or trailer, excepting state and local taxes
and license, title, and other fees. It shall be unlawful to advertise
prices described as unpaid balance unless they are the full cash selling
price and to advertise price which is not the full selling price even
though qualified with expressions such as with trade, with acceptable
trade, or other similar words;
(9) To advertise as at cost, below cost, below invoice, or
wholesale, unless the term used is strictly construed that the word cost
as used in this subdivision or in a similar meaning is the actual price
paid by the advertiser to the manufacturer for the motor vehicle,
motorcycle, or trailer so advertised;
(10) To advertise claims that Everybody Financed, No Credit
Rejected, or We Finance Anyone and other similar affirmative statements;
(11) To advertise a specific trade-in amount or range of amounts;
(12) To advertise the words Finance, Loan, or Discounts or others of
similar import in the firm name or trade style of a person offering motor
vehicles, motorcycles, and trailers for sale unless such person is
actually engaged in the finance business and offering only bona fide
repossessed motor vehicles, motorcycles, and trailers. It shall be
unlawful to use the word Repossessed in the name or trade style of a firm
in the advertising of motor vehicles, motorcycles, and trailers sold by
such a company unless they are bona fide repossessions sold for unpaid
balances due only. Advertisers offering repossessed automobiles for sale
shall be able to offer proof of repossession;
(13) To advertise the term Authorized Dealer in any way as to
mislead as to the make or makes of motor vehicles, motorcycles, or
trailers for which a dealer is franchised to sell at retail;
-5-

LB1223 LB1223
2026 2026
(14) To advertise or sell new motor vehicles, motorcycles, and
trailers by any person not enfranchised by the manufacturer of the motor
vehicle, motorcycle, or trailer offered without disclosing the fact in
each advertisement which includes the motor vehicle, motorcycle, or
trailer, and in writing in the lease or purchase agreement that the
licensee or motor vehicle dealer is not enfranchised by the manufacturer
for service under factory warranty provisions. No person shall transfer
ownership of a motor vehicle by reassignment on a manufacturer's
statement of origin unless the person is enfranchised to do so by the
manufacturer of the motor vehicle;
(15) To advertise used motor vehicles, motorcycles, or trailers so
as to create the impression that they are new. Used motor vehicles,
motorcycles, and trailers of the current and preceding model year shall
be clearly identified as Used, Executive Driven, Demonstrator, or Driver
Training, and lease cars, taxicabs, fleet vehicles, police motor
vehicles, or motorcycles as may be the case and descriptions such as Low
Mileage or Slightly Driven may also be applied only when correct. The
terms demonstrator's, executive's, and official's motor vehicles,
motorcycles, or trailers shall not be used unless (a) they have never
been sold to a member of the public, (b) such terms describe motor
vehicles, motorcycles, or trailers used by new motor vehicle, motorcycle,
or trailer dealers or their employees for demonstrating performance
ability, and (c) such vehicles are advertised for sale as such only by an
authorized dealer in the same make of motor vehicle, motorcycle, or
trailer. Phrases such as Last of the Remaining, Closeout, or Final
Clearance and others of similar import shall not be used in advertising
used motor vehicles, motorcycles, and trailers so as to convey the
impression that the motor vehicles, motorcycles, and trailers offered are
holdover new motor vehicles, motorcycles, and trailers. When new and used
motor vehicles, motorcycles, and trailers of the current and preceding
model year are offered in the same advertisement, such offers shall be
-6-

LB1223 LB1223
2026 2026
clearly separated by description, layout, and art treatment;
(16) To advertise executives' or officials' motor vehicles,
motorcycles, or trailers unless they have been used exclusively by the
personnel or executive of the motor vehicle, motorcycle, or trailer
manufacturer or by an executive of any authorized dealer of the same make
thereof and such motor vehicles, motorcycles, and trailers have not been
sold to a member of the public prior to the appearance of the
advertisement;
(17) To advertise motor vehicles, motorcycles, and trailers owned by
or in the possession of dealers without the name of the dealership or in
any other manner so as to convey the impression that they are being
offered by private parties;
(18) To advertise the term wholesale in connection with the retail
offering of used motor vehicles, motorcycles, and trailers;
(19) To advertise the terms auction or auction special and other
terms of similar import unless such terms are used in connection with
motor vehicles, motorcycles, and trailers offered or sold at a bona fide
auction to the highest bidder and under such other specific conditions as
may be required in the Motor Vehicle Industry Regulation Act;
(20) To advertise free driving trial unless it means a trial without
obligation of any kind and that the motor vehicle, motorcycle, or trailer
may be returned in the period specified without obligation or cost. A
driving trial advertised on a money back basis or with privilege of
exchange or applying money paid on another motor vehicle, motorcycle, or
trailer shall be so explained. Terms and conditions of driving trials,
free or otherwise, shall be set forth in writing for the customer;
(21) To advertise (a) the term Manufacturer's Warranty unless it is
used in advertising only in reference to cars covered by a bona fide
factory warranty for that particular make of motor vehicle, motorcycle,
or trailer. In the event only a portion of such warranty is remaining,
then reference to a warranty may be used only if stated that that unused
-7-

LB1223 LB1223
2026 2026
portion of the warranty is still in effect, (b) the term New Car
Guarantee except in connection with new motor vehicles, motorcycles, and
trailers, and (c) the terms Ninety-day Warranty, Fifty-fifty Guarantee,
Three-hundred-mile Guarantee, and Six-month Warranty, unless the major
terms and exclusions are sufficiently described in the advertisement;
(22) To advertise representations inconsistent with or contrary to
the fact that a motor vehicle, motorcycle, or trailer is sold as is and
without a guarantee. The customer contract shall clearly indicate when a
car will be sold with a guarantee and what that guarantee is and
similarly shall clearly indicate when a car is sold as is and without a
guarantee; and
(23) To advertise or to make any statement, declaration, or
representation in any advertisement that cannot be substantiated in fact,
and the burden of proof of the factual basis for the statement,
declaration, or representation shall be on the licensee or motor vehicle
dealer and not on the board; and .
(24) To sell any motor vehicle that is equipped with headlights that
are in violation of section 60-6,221.
Sec. 4. Section 60-1411.04, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
60-1411.04 A violation The use, employment, or publication of
advertising by any licensee or motor vehicle dealer of which does not
comply with section 60-1411.03 is hereby declared to be an unlawful act,
and any person violating such section shall be guilty of a Class V
misdemeanor.
Sec. 5. Section 60-1437, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
60-1437 In addition to the restrictions imposed by section 60-1436,
a manufacturer or distributor shall not:
(1) Fail to deliver new motor vehicles or new motor vehicle parts or
accessories within a reasonable time and in reasonable quantities
-8-

LB1223 LB1223
2026 2026
relative to the new motor vehicle dealer's market area and facilities,
unless the failure is caused by acts or occurrences beyond the control of
the manufacturer or distributor or unless the failure results from an
order by the new motor vehicle dealer in excess of quantities reasonably
and fairly allocated by the manufacturer or distributor;
(2) Refuse to disclose to a new motor vehicle dealer the method and
manner of distribution of new motor vehicles by the manufacturer or
distributor or, if a line-make is allocated among new motor vehicle
dealers, refuse to disclose to any new motor vehicle dealer that handles
the same line-make the system of allocation, including, but not limited
to, a complete breakdown by model, and a concise listing of dealerships
with an explanation of the derivation of the allocation system, including
its mathematical formula in a clear and comprehensible form;
(3) Refuse to disclose to a new motor vehicle dealer the total
number of new motor vehicles of a given model which the manufacturer or
distributor has sold during the current model year within the dealer's
marketing district, zone, or region, whichever geographical area is the
smallest;
(4) Increase the price of any new motor vehicle which the new motor
vehicle dealer had ordered and delivered to the same retail consumer for
whom the vehicle was ordered, if the order was made prior to the dealer's
receipt of the written official price increase notification. A sales
contract signed by a private retail consumer and binding on the dealer
shall constitute evidence of such order. In the event of manufacturer or
distributor price reduction or cash rebate, the amount of any reduction
or rebate received by a dealer shall be passed on to the private retail
consumer by the dealer. Any price reduction in excess of five dollars
shall apply to all vehicles in the dealer's inventory which were subject
to the price reduction. A price difference applicable to a new model or
series of motor vehicles at the time of the introduction of the new model
or series shall not be considered a price increase or price decrease.
-9-

LB1223 LB1223
2026 2026
This subdivision shall not apply to price changes caused by the
following:
(a) The addition to a motor vehicle of required or optional
equipment pursuant to state or federal law;
(b) In the case of foreign-made vehicles or components, revaluation
of the United States dollar; or
(c) Any increase in transportation charges due to an increase in
rates charged by a common carrier or other transporter;
(5) Fail or refuse to sell or offer to sell to all franchised new
motor vehicle dealers in a line-make every new motor vehicle sold or
offered for sale to any franchised new motor vehicle dealer of the same
line-make. However, the failure to deliver any such new motor vehicle
shall not be considered a violation of this section if the failure is due
to a lack of manufacturing capacity or to a strike or labor difficulty, a
shortage of materials, a freight embargo, or any other cause over which
the franchisor has no control. A manufacturer or distributor shall not
require that any of its new motor vehicle dealers located in this state
pay any extra fee, purchase unreasonable or unnecessary quantities of
advertising displays or other materials, or remodel, renovate, or
recondition the new motor vehicle dealer's existing facilities in order
to receive any particular model or series of vehicles manufactured or
distributed by the manufacturer for which the dealers have a valid
franchise. Notwithstanding the provisions of this subdivision, nothing
contained in this section shall be deemed to prohibit or prevent a
manufacturer from requiring that its franchised dealers located in this
state purchase special tools or equipment, stock reasonable quantities of
certain parts, or participate in training programs which are reasonably
necessary for those dealers to sell or service any model or series of new
motor vehicles. This subdivision shall not apply to manufacturers of
recreational vehicles;
(6) Fail to offer dealers of a specific line-make a new franchise
-10-

LB1223 LB1223
2026 2026
agreement containing substantially similar terms and conditions for sales
of the line-make if the ownership of the manufacturer or distributor
changes or there is a change in the plan or system of distribution;
(7) Take an adverse action against a dealer because the dealer sells
or leases a motor vehicle that is later exported to a location outside
the United States. A franchise provision that allows a manufacturer or
distributor to take adverse action against a dealer because the dealer
sells or leases a motor vehicle that is later exported to a location
outside the United States is enforceable only if, at the time of the
original sale or lease, the dealer knew or reasonably should have known
that the motor vehicle would be exported to a location outside the United
States. A dealer is presumed to have no knowledge that a motor vehicle
the dealer sells or leases will be exported to a location outside the
United States if, under the laws of a state of the United States (a) the
motor vehicle is titled, (b) the motor vehicle is registered, and (c)
applicable state and local taxes are paid for the motor vehicle. Such
presumption may be rebutted by direct, clear, and convincing evidence
that the dealer knew or reasonably should have known at the time of the
original sale or lease that the motor vehicle would be exported to a
location outside the United States. Except as otherwise permitted by
subdivision (7) of this section, a franchise provision that allows a
manufacturer or distributor to take adverse action against a dealer
because the dealer sells or leases a motor vehicle that is later exported
to a location outside the United States is void and unenforceable;
(8) Discriminate against a dealer holding a franchise for a line-
make of the manufacturer or distributor in favor of other dealers of the
same line-make in this state by:
(a) Selling or offering to sell a new motor vehicle to a dealer at a
lower actual price, including the price for vehicle transportation, than
the actual price at which the same model similarly equipped is offered to
or is available to another dealer in this state during a similar time
-11-

LB1223 LB1223
2026 2026
period; or
(b) Using a promotional program or device or an incentive, payment,
or other benefit, whether paid at the time of the sale of the new motor
vehicle to the dealer or later, that results in the sale or offer to sell
a new motor vehicle to a dealer at a lower price, including the price for
vehicle transportation, than the price at which the same model similarly
equipped is offered or is available to another dealer in this state
during a similar time period. This subdivision shall not prohibit a
promotional or incentive program that is functionally available to
competing dealers of the same line-make in this state on substantially
comparable terms;
(9) Refuse to pay a new motor vehicle dealer for sales incentives,
service incentives, rebates, or other forms of incentive compensation
within thirty days after their approval by the manufacturer or
distributor. The manufacturer or distributor shall either approve or
disapprove each claim by the dealer within thirty days after receipt of
the claim in a proper form generally used by the manufacturer or
distributor. Any claims not specifically disapproved in writing within
thirty days after receipt shall be considered to be approved;
(10) Perform an audit to confirm payment of a sales incentive,
service incentive, rebate, or other form of incentive compensation more
than twelve months after the date of payment of the claim or twelve
months after the end of the incentive program by the new motor vehicle
dealer unless the claim is fraudulent;
(11) Reduce the amount to be paid to a new motor vehicle dealer for
a sales incentive, service incentive, rebate, or other form of incentive
compensation or charge back a new motor vehicle dealer subsequent to the
payment of the claim for a sales incentive, service incentive, rebate, or
other form of incentive compensation unless the manufacturer or
distributor shows that the claim lacks required documentation or is
alleged to be false, fraudulent, or based on a misrepresentation.
-12-

LB1223 LB1223
2026 2026
A manufacturer or distributor may not deny a claim based solely on a
new motor vehicle dealer's incidental failure to comply with a specific
claim processing requirement, such as a clerical error, that does not put
into question the legitimacy of the claim. No reduction in the amount to
be paid to the new motor vehicle dealer and no charge back subsequent to
the payment of a claim may be made until the new motor vehicle dealer has
had notice and an opportunity to correct any deficiency and resubmit the
claim and to participate in all franchisor internal appeal processes as
well as all available legal processes. If a charge back is the subject of
adjudication, internal appeal, mediation, or arbitration, no charge back
shall be made until, in the case of an adjudication or legal action, a
final order has been issued.
A claim for reimbursement by the manufacturer or distributor of sums
due following an audit must be presented to the dealer within ninety days
after completion of the audit of the item subject to the claim. A
manufacturer or distributor may not setoff or otherwise take control over
funds owned or under the control of the new motor vehicle dealer or which
are in an account designated for the new motor vehicle dealer when such
action is based upon the findings of an audit or other claim with respect
thereto until a final decision is issued with respect to any challenge or
appeal by either party of any such audit or claim.
Any ambiguity or inconsistency in submission guidelines shall be
construed against the manufacturer or distributor;
(12) Make any express or implied statement or representation
directly or indirectly that the dealer is under any obligation whatsoever
to offer to sell or sell any extended service contract, extended
maintenance plan, gap policy, gap waiver, or other aftermarket product or
service offered, sold, backed by, or sponsored by the manufacturer or
distributor or to sell, assign, or transfer any of the dealer's retail
sales contracts or leases in this state on motor vehicles manufactured or
sold by the manufacturer or distributor to a finance company or class of
-13-

LB1223 LB1223
2026 2026
finance companies, leasing company or class of leasing companies, or
other specified person, because of any relationship or affiliation
between the manufacturer or distributor and the finance company or
companies, leasing company or leasing companies, or the specified person
or persons; or
(13) Prohibit a franchisee from acquiring a line-make of new motor
vehicles solely because the franchisee owns or operates a franchise of
the same line-make in a contiguous market; or .
(14) Sell or distribute any motor vehicle that is equipped with
headlights that are in violation of section 60-6,221.
Any such statements, threats, promises, acts, contracts, or offers
of contracts, when their effect may be to lessen or eliminate competition
or tend to create a monopoly, are declared unfair trade practices and
unfair methods of competition and are prohibited.
Sec. 6. Original sections 60-6,221, 60-6,224, 60-1411.03,
60-1411.04, and 60-1437, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, are
repealed.
-14-